California, session 20252026, SB466.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 116341 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:116341. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (e) and subject to subdivision (b), a public water system shall not be determined, held, considered, or otherwise deemed in violation of the primary drinking water standard for hexavalent chromium while implementing a state board approved compliance plan. A public water system that has submitted a compliance plan for approval shall not be determined, held, considered, or otherwise deemed in violation of the primary drinking water standard for hexavalent chromium while state board action on the proposed and submitted compliance plan is pending.(b) This section only applies to a public water system that meets the total chromium maximum contaminant level (MCL) enforceable standard for drinking water in California.(c) This section does not affect the state’s requirements for establishing drinking water standards for contaminants in drinking water. This section does not apply to any contaminants other than hexavalent chromium. (d) This section shall not apply if a hexavalent chromium MCL compliance plan is rejected by the state board.(e) This section does not affect the authority of the state board or the Attorney General to enforce any applicable law or regulation regarding hexavalent chromium, including a state board-approved hexavalent chromium MCL compliance plan.